Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB225.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 26 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 717. Compensation for loss of goodwill.(a) Compensation.--The owner of a business conducted on the property taken, or on the remainder if the property is part of a larger parcel, shall be compensated for loss of goodwill if the owner proves all of the following:(1) The loss is caused by the taking of the property or the injury to the remainder.(2) Compensation for the loss will not be duplicated in the compensation otherwise awarded to the owner.(b) Rebuttal of compensation.--The acquiring agency may rebut the compensation under subsection (a) if the acquiring agency proves that the loss could have reasonably been prevented 12345678910111213141516171819 by a relocation of the business or by taking steps and adopting procedures that a reasonably prudent person would take and adopt in preserving the goodwill.(c) Leaseback agreement.--If the acquiring agency and the owner enter into a leaseback agreement, the following shall apply:(1) No additional goodwill shall accrue during the lease.(2) The entering of a leaseback agreement shall not be a factor in determining goodwill and any liability for goodwill shall be established and paid at the time of acquisition of the property by eminent domain or subsequent to notice that the property may be taken by eminent domain.(d) Use of State tax returns.--(1) If the owner of a business and the acquiring agency do not agree on the value of goodwill, the owner of a business claiming compensation under this section shall make available to the board of viewers or court, and the board of viewers or court shall, upon terms and conditions as will preserve confidentiality, make available to the acquiring agency the State tax returns of the business for audit for confidential use solely for the purpose of determining the amount of compensation under this section.(2) Nothing in this section affects any right a party may otherwise have to discovery or to require the production of documents, papers, books and accounts.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Goodwill." The benefits that accrue to a business as a 20250SB0225PN0377 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 result of its location, cultural heritage value to the community, reputation for dependability, skill or quality and any other circumstances resulting in probable retention of old or acquisition of new patronage.Section 2. This act shall apply retroactively to a declaration of taking filed on or after January 1, 2024.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0225PN0377 - 3 - 1234567